Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2282YC (6) 91 je/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. REGENTS INSTITUTION ââ POTTAWATTAMIE COUNTY 1 ââ STUDY. The department of education shall conduct a 2 study of the feasibility of establishing an institution of 3 higher education governed by the state board of regents, 4 which offers undergraduate and graduate degree programs, in 5 Pottawattamie county or a contiguous county. The study shall 6 also include a recommendation of the city in the specified 7 region that would be most suitable for the location of such an 8 institution, tentative timelines in which such an institution 9 could be established and become operational, and analysis 10 of key determinations that must be made to effectuate such 11 establishment. The department may consult with any relevant 12 federal, state, or local agencies or stakeholders to carry 13 out the study. The department shall submit a report with its 14 findings and recommendations to the governor and the general 15 assembly by December 31, 2025. 16